src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Vj Y 29
SFX Vj 0 é/G0 .
SFX Vj 0 é'l/G0 .
SFX Vj 0 é/XxV3V4 .
SFX Vj 0 ás/G0 .
SFX Vj 0 ás/XxV7V8 .
SFX Vj 0 á/G1 .
SFX Vj 0 á'l/G1 .
SFX Vj 0 á/XxV1V2 .
SFX Vj 0 emos/G2 .
SFX Vj 0 émos/XxV5V6 .
SFX Vj 0 éis/G3 .
SFX Vj 0 éis/XxV9V0 .
SFX Vj 0 án/G1 .
SFX Vj 0 án/XxV1V2 .
SFX Vj 0 ía/G1 .
SFX Vj 0 ía'l/G1 .
SFX Vj 0 ía/XxV1V2V3V4 .
SFX Vj 0 íes/G0 .
SFX Vj 0 íes/XxV7V8 .
SFX Vj 0 íamos/G2 .
SFX Vj 0 íamos/XxV5V6 .
SFX Vj 0 íemos/G2 .
SFX Vj 0 íemos/XxV5V6 .
SFX Vj 0 íais/G3 .
SFX Vj 0 íais/XxV9V0 .
SFX Vj 0 íeis/G3 .
SFX Vj 0 íeis/XxV9V0 .
SFX Vj 0 íen/G1 .
SFX Vj 0 íen/XxV1V2 .

SFX Vk Y 45
SFX Vk ar aba/G1 ar
SFX Vk ar aba'l/G1 ar
SFX Vk ar ába/XxV1V2V3V4 ar
SFX Vk ar abes/G0 ar
SFX Vk ar ábes/XxV7V8 ar
SFX Vk ar ábamos/G2 ar
SFX Vk ar ábamos/XxV5V6 ar
SFX Vk ar ábemos/G2 ar
SFX Vk ar ábemos/XxV5V6 ar
SFX Vk ar abais/G3 ar
SFX Vk ar ábais/XxV9V0 ar
SFX Vk ar abeis/G3 ar
SFX Vk ar ábeis/XxV9V0 ar
SFX Vk ar aben/G1 ar
SFX Vk ar áben/XxV1V2 ar
SFX Vk er ía/G1 er
SFX Vk er ía'l/G1 er
SFX Vk er ía/XxV1V2V3V4 er
SFX Vk er íes/G0 er
SFX Vk er íes/XxV7V8 er
SFX Vk er íamos/G2 er
SFX Vk er íamos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vk er íemos/G2 er
SFX Vk er íemos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vk er íais/G3 er
SFX Vk er íais/XxV9V0 er
SFX Vk er íeis/G3 er
SFX Vk er íeis/XxV9V0 er
SFX Vk er íen/G1 er
SFX Vk er íen/XxV1V2 er
SFX Vk ir ía/G1 ir
SFX Vk ir ía'l/G1 ir
SFX Vk ir ía/XxV1V2V3V4 ir
SFX Vk ir íes/G0 ir
SFX Vk ir íes/XxV7V8 ir
SFX Vk ir íamos/G2 ir
SFX Vk ir íamos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vk ir íemos/G2 ir
SFX Vk ir íemos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vk ir íais/G3 ir
SFX Vk ir íais/XxV9V0 ir
SFX Vk ir íeis/G3 ir
SFX Vk ir íeis/XxV9V0 ir
SFX Vk ir íen/G1 ir
SFX Vk ir íen/XxV1V2 ir

SFX Vl Y 24
SFX Vl 0 a/G1 .
SFX Vl 0 a'l/G1 .
SFX Vl er éra/XxV1V2V3V4 er
SFX Vl ib íba/XxV1V2 ib
SFX Vl 0 es/G0 .
SFX Vl er éres/XxV7V8 er
SFX Vl ib íbes/XxV7V8 ib
SFX Vl 0 ais/G3 .
SFX Vl er érais/XxV9V0 er
SFX Vl ib íbais/XxV9V0 ib
SFX Vl 0 eis/G3 .
SFX Vl er éreis/XxV9V0 er
SFX Vl ib íbeis/XxV9V0 ib
SFX Vl er éramos/G2 er
SFX Vl er éramos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vl ib íbamos/G2 ib
SFX Vl ib íbamos/XxV5V6 ib
SFX Vl er éremos/G2 er
SFX Vl er éremos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vl ib íbemos/G2 ib
SFX Vl ib íbemos/XxV5V6 ib
SFX Vl 0 en/G1 .
SFX Vl er éren/XxV1V2 er
SFX Vl ib íben/XxV1V2 ib
