src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abaullar/VtVdVvVhVjVkVmVr
ablucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abrigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acadigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acaronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aceptar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acombayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acorripiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acudir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adientrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afarolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aforzar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
agalbanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agrandecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguyapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alcobar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allambrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allombar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alterar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amanoyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amazacotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amigayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amorosar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anegralar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
antemanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apalpayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apastoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apeliyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apezonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apiolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apolmonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apradiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apuñascar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arigonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arranchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrebotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrelloriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrexuntar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arromanzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asoballar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
astraer/VtVaVjVkVr
atarabazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atenyerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atoldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atrollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
autografiar/VtVuVwVjVkVmVr
averriondar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
axitanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
azopinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
añidiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bastir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
biltar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
boriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
burbusar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cadecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
caligrafiar/VtVuVwVhVjVkVmVr
candoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
carecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
casar/VtSmYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cecear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chamuscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chasquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chorrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cimonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
clisar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
colligar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
comportar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
confiar/VtVuVwVhVjVkVmVr
contemporizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
conxuntar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
corviar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cuadriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
curuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
decapitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
demozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
derrosar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desacuartelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desaguapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desarchivar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desatarabicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desbocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descolumbrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desdicir/VtVaVkVr
desdir/XxVj st:desdicir
desemplegar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenduvellar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
desenllabanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desentrenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desfilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desfinxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desmangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desmaquillar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
despachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desparexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
destinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
destituir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
devanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
devanexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dib/XxVl st:dir 
discutir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
diseccionar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
domar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dominicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embabiecar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embarronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emborizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emboroñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emburriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embutiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empapellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empapirotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empecatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empeñizcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emporiyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empotrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enayenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encampar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encanalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encargar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encebatiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encelegar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enchumbar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encinayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encontar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encoplar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encuchizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encumbriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
endurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enduxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enflorecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfogar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
engachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engafentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engaritar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engarrifar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engorguyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engoscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enguichar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllardiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllatiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enmorgazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ennegrecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enreciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enreplar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enrubiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enruinecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entafurriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entalangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enteicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entemediar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entontecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entornellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entrellaciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entremediar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entumir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entusiasmar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
envizcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
envolubrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enzafainar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enzalaburdiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
erupcionar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbabayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbarriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esblanquisnar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbocinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escafeinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escagarriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escapiciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarabayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaspiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaturriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escolfar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escolfuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escotonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escoxalandrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escuyerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfacer/VtVbVkVr
esforgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esforguitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgarrapatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgarrotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esixir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
eslizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmembrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
esmendrayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esneldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esnoxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espatalexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espatarrangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espesar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espeyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esporpollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espotexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estampinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estaquerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estopar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estordigañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estrayer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVr
estroncar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estropiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esñizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
evaluar/VtVuVwVhVjVkVmVr
febreriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
feder/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
folganzaniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fomentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fronyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
frutiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gargaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
garranchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gospiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
grabar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
hibernar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
hipar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
inflamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ingresar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llabegar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
llacar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llegalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llentecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
macexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
maciyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
manxir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
maraviar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
meditar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mendar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
monoptongar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mordigañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
namorisquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
narrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ofrecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
omitir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
palpuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pantrucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pedrasquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
picar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pidiguñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
polear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pollasquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
prestar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
prexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
quebrantar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
querer/VtVfVhVkVrSmYs
rapiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
raserar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reboriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reburdiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
recuartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
redactar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reguardar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reimprentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
remuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
resbalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
resclamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reteyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
retorcer/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
rezusmiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
roñecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ruciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sebar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
secuestrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sobrecargar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sobresaltar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sonetiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sonsoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
suceder/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sulfurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tapiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tarabazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
terrar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
testoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
torombicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
toxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trepiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trescordar/VtVbVfVhVjVkVmVr
trociar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trosar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vagoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vaporiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vixar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
volcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xinglar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xirimiquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
yer/XxVl st:ser 
zapalastrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zarandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
